Missouri, session 2026, HB3173.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 196, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 196.1172, to read as follows:
196.1172. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "7-OH", 7-hydroxymitragynine, including its isomers, esters, ethers, salts,
and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, regardless of whether naturally extracted or
synthetically produced;
(2) "Mitragynine-derived product", any product that contains:
(a) Mitragynine pseudoindoxyl; or
(b) A level of 7-OH in the alkaloid fraction that is greater than two percent of the
overall alkaloid composition of the product;
(3) "Research institution", an institution of higher education or any other entity
that is organized and operated primarily to conduct scientific or medical research.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is unlawful to knowingly
possess, prepare, sell, distribute, or advertise any mitragynine-derived product.
3. This section shall not apply to the possession, preparation, sale, distribution,
or advertisement of any mitragynine-derived product for scientific or medical research
at a research institution.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.